Massachusetts, session 194th, H2616.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 237: Duty of residential premises owners; Window Falls Prevention Program
(a) Definitions:
(1) The term “Department” means the Department of Public Health.
(2) The term “Window guard” means a bar, screen, or grille assembly installed in a
window for the purpose of preventing a child from accidently falling out of the window, in
accordance with the regulations promulgated by the Department.
(b) Whenever a child under six years of age resides in any premises in which any window
accessible to the child is on the third floor or higher floor, the owner shall install window guards
in any such windows. If any such windows are an access to fire escape routes or structures, the
of 3

window guard shall be removable. At no time shall the window guards be removed for any
reason except emergency egress in times of a fire or other situation involving hazardous
materials
(c) If the owner is a landlord, the window guards shall be provided at no additional cost
to the tenant. The tenant shall not remove the window guards for any reason except emergency
egress in times of a fire or other situation involving hazardous materials. The obligation of a
landlord to install window guards under this section shall not affect the ability of a renter to lease
the unit; and any discrimination by the landlord in this regard shall be punishable by a fine of not
less than $500 but not more than $1000.
(d) There shall be a Window Falls Prevention Program established within the
Department of Public Health. The purpose of said program shall be as follows:
Educating the public about the danger to children, age six (6) years and under, of falling
from windows; and the importance of installing window guards in all dwellings occupied by
children age six (6) and under. The Program shall conduct education and outreach efforts
promoting awareness about the dangers to children, age six (6) years and under falling from open
or otherwise unprotected windows. Information and technical assistance shall be made available
to the public on the steps and devices that may mitigate this serious problem. The Program shall
work with any and all existing agencies and departments involved with children in its outreach
efforts.
(e) No occupant or any other person, shall obstruct or interfere with the installation of
window guards, nor shall any person remove or otherwise render ineffective window guards.
of 3

(f) The Department shall, within a reasonable period of time, investigate complaints filed
with regard to a violation under this section, and may impose up to a $10,000 civil penalty for a
violation not remedied within ten business days.
of 3